Maine, session 132, LD748.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Bridging Rental Assistance Program Z205
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding for the Bridging Rental Assistance Program to reduce
the waiting list for assistance and increase housing vouchers by addressing the increase in
program costs resulting from a 2021 policy change that increased the portion of a
participant's rent paid by the program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $660,000 $660,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $660,000 $660,000